Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 8. Health Care Provider Retention Program

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 177, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 19-9-801 through 19-9-804.
National guard health care provider retention program; administration of program. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 177, § 1.

§ 19-9-805.
Sunset.

W.S.

19-9-801

through 19-9-804 are repealed effective June 30, 2017.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 177, § 1; 2013 ch. 40, § 1, effective February 14, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “2017” for “2013”.

Laws 2013, ch. 40, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 14, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 177, § 1, enacted this section as § 19-9-705.
It has been redesignated as §

19-9-805

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 177, § 3, provides: “All monies appropriated for purposes of this article shall not lapse until the program is terminated as provided by W.S.

19-9-805

.”